Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF689.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1886YH (3) 91 ll/jh H.F. 689 Section 1. Section 331.304, subsection 13, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, subsection 16, Code 2025, is amended 3 by striking the subsection. 4 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 562A.11A Prohibition on distinction, 5 discrimination, or restriction based on source of income of 6 tenant. 7 1. As used in this section, âsource of incomeâ includes 8 benefits or subsidy programs including housing assistance, 9 housing choice vouchers provided under 42 U.S.C. Â§1437f, 10 public assistance, veteransâ benefits, social security, 11 supplemental security income or other retirement programs, and 12 other programs administered by any federal, state, local, or 13 nonprofit entity. âSource of incomeâ does not include income 14 that a prospective tenant cannot demonstrate is derived from 15 sources and activities permitted by law and is provided on an 16 ongoing basis, or housing assistance that is not approved by 17 the appropriate agency within thirty days after the landlord 18 provides all information required as a condition of the 19 agencyâs approval, including evidence that all repairs required 20 before occupancy have been completed. 21 2. A landlord shall not, based on the source of income of 22 an otherwise eligible prospective or current tenant, do any of 23 the following: 24 a. Deny or terminate a tenancy to the prospective or current 25 tenant. 26 b. Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction 27 against the prospective or current tenant in the price, terms, 28 conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, lease, 29 or occupancy of a dwelling unit or in the furnishing of any 30 facilities or services in connection with the rental, lease, or 31 occupancy of the dwelling unit. 32 c. Otherwise make unavailable or deny any dwelling unit to 33 the prospective or current tenant if the prospective or current 34 tenant would be eligible to rent the dwelling unit but for the 35 -1- LSB 1886YH (3) 91 ll/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 689 individualâs source of income. 1 d. Represent to the prospective tenant that a dwelling unit 2 is not available for inspection, rental, or lease when in fact 3 the dwelling unit is available, or knowingly fail to bring a 4 rental listing to the prospective tenantâs attention, or refuse 5 to permit the prospective tenant to inspect a dwelling unit. 6 e. Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction 7 against the prospective or current tenant in the price, 8 terms, conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, 9 lease, or occupancy of any dwelling unit on the basis of 10 the prospective or current tenantâs use of emergency rental 11 assistance. 12 f. If the landlord requires a prospective or current tenant 13 to have a certain threshold level of income, exclude any 14 source of income in the form of a rent voucher or subsidy when 15 calculating whether the income criteria have been met. This 16 paragraph does not apply to emergency rental assistance. 17 g. Attempt to discourage the rental or lease of any dwelling 18 unit to the prospective or current tenant. 19 h. Publish, circulate, display, or cause to be published, 20 circulated, or displayed any communication, notice, 21 advertisement, or sign of any kind relating to the rental 22 or lease of any dwelling unit that indicates a preference, 23 limitation, or requirement based on any source of income. 24 i. Assist, induce, incite, or coerce another person to 25 commit an act or engage in a practice that violates this 26 section. 27 j. Coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any 28 person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of 29 the person having exercised or enjoyed or having aided or 30 encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, 31 any right granted or protected under this section. 32 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 562B.11A Prohibition on distinction, 33 discrimination, or restriction based on source of income of 34 tenant. 35 -2- LSB 1886YH (3) 91 ll/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 689 1. As used in this section, âsource of incomeâ means the 1 same as defined in section 562A.11A. 2 2. A landlord shall not, based on the source of income of 3 an otherwise eligible prospective or current tenant, do any of 4 the following: 5 a. Deny or terminate a tenancy to the prospective or current 6 tenant. 7 b. Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction 8 against the prospective or current tenant in the price, terms, 9 conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, lease, 10 or occupancy of a mobile home space or in the furnishing of any 11 facilities or services in connection with the rental, lease, or 12 occupancy of the mobile home space. 13 c. Otherwise make unavailable or deny any mobile home space 14 to the prospective or current tenant if the prospective or 15 current tenant would be eligible to rent the mobile home space 16 but for the individualâs source of income. 17 d. Represent to the prospective tenant that a mobile home 18 space is not available for inspection, rental, or lease when in 19 fact the mobile home space is available, or knowingly fail to 20 bring a rental listing to the prospective tenantâs attention, 21 or refuse to permit the prospective tenant to inspect a mobile 22 home space. 23 e. Make any distinction, discrimination, or restriction 24 against the prospective or current tenant in the price, 25 terms, conditions, fees, or privileges relating to the rental, 26 lease, or occupancy of any mobile home space on the basis of 27 the prospective or current tenantâs use of emergency rental 28 assistance. 29 f. If the landlord requires a prospective or current tenant 30 to have a certain threshold level of income, exclude any 31 source of income in the form of a rent voucher or subsidy when 32 calculating whether the income criteria have been met. This 33 paragraph does not apply to emergency rental assistance. 34 g. Attempt to discourage the rental or lease of any mobile 35 -3- LSB 1886YH (3) 91 ll/jh 3/ 5 H.F. 689 home space to the prospective or current tenant. 1 h. Publish, circulate, display, or cause to be published, 2 circulated, or displayed any communication, notice, 3 advertisement, or sign of any kind relating to the rental or 4 lease of any mobile home space that indicates a preference, 5 limitation, or requirement based on any source of income. 6 i. Assist, induce, incite, or coerce another person to 7 commit an act or engage in a practice that violates this 8 section. 9 j. Coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any 10 person in the exercise or enjoyment of, or on account of 11 the person having exercised or enjoyed or having aided or 12 encouraged any other person in the exercise or enjoyment of, 13 any right granted or protected under this section. 14